Arkansas, session 2025, HB1894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends for this act to ensure the fair and
equitable assessment of all real property used for housing, including without
limitation real property used for affordable housing.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1202, concerning valuation procedures
for property, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(j) The Assessment Coordination Division shall promulgate rules,
including guidelines, for the fair and equitable assessment of real property
that has federally imposed or state-imposed restrictions that use rent
limitations, operations requirements, or any other restrictions on the real
*JLL321*
04-08-2025 09:46:36 JLL321

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1894
property that are connected to:
(1) The real property being eligible for an income tax
credit under 26 U.S.C. § 42;
(2) Real property constructed with the use of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development HOME Investment
Partnerships Program; or
(3) Real property constructed with the use of incentives
provided by the United States Department of Agriculture under 42 U.S.C. §
1485.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Assessment Coordination Division shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The division shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/Beaty Jr.













04-08-2025 09:46:36 JLL321